Washington statutes.
RCW 11.42.020

Notice to creditors—Manner—Filings—Publication.

(1) Subject to subsection (2) of this section, a notice agent may give nonprobate notice to the creditors of the decedent if:

(a) As of the date of the filing of the notice to creditors with the court, the notice agent has no knowledge of another person acting as notice agent or of the appointment of a personal representative in the decedent's estate in the state of Washington; and

(b) According to the records of the court as are available on the date of the filing of the notice to creditors, no cause number regarding the decedent has been issued to any other notice agent and no personal representative of the decedent's estate had been appointed.

(2) The notice agent must give notice to the creditors of the decedent, in substantially the form set forth in RCW 11.42.030, announcing that the notice agent has elected to give nonprobate notice to creditors and requiring that persons having claims against the decedent present their claims within the time specified in RCW 11.42.050 or be forever barred as to claims against the decedent's probate and nonprobate assets.

(a) The notice agent shall file the notice with the court.

(b) The notice agent shall cause the notice to be published once each week for three successive weeks in a legal newspaper in the notice county.

(c) The notice agent may at any time give actual notice to creditors who become known to the notice agent by serving the notice on the creditor or mailing the notice to the creditor at the creditor's last known address, by regular first-class mail, postage prepaid.

(d) The notice agent shall also mail a copy of the notice, including the decedent's social security number, to the state of Washington department of social and health services' office of financial recovery.

(e) If the decedent was a resident of the state of Washington at the time of death and the notice agent's declaration and oath were filed in a county other than the county of the decedent's residence, then instead of the requirements in (a) and (b) of this subsection, the notice agent shall cause the notice to creditors in substantially the form set forth in RCW 11.42.030 to be published once each week for three successive weeks in a legal newspaper in the county of the decedent's residence and shall file the notice with the superior court of the county in which the notice agent's declaration and oath were filed.

The notice agent shall file with the court proof by affidavit of the giving and publication of the notice.

[ 2005 c 97 s 8; 1997 c 252 s 25; 1995 1st sp.s. c 18 s 59; 1994 c 221 s 32.]

NOTES:

Application—1997 c 252 ss 1-73: See note following RCW 11.02.005.

Conflict with federal requirements—Severability—Effective date—1995 1st sp.s. c 18: See notes following RCW 74.39A.030.

Effective dates—1994 c 221: See note following RCW 11.100.035.